Arkansas, session 2025, HB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TITLE.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Pain Relief Parity
Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-408. Medicaid pain relief parity.
In establishing and maintaining the formulary and preferred drug list
for the Arkansas Medicaid Program, the Department of Human Services shall
ensure that a non-opioid drug approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration with no therapeutic equivalent for the treatment or management
of pain shall not be disadvantaged or discouraged with respect to coverage
relative to any opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of
pain on the formulary and preferred drug list, including without limitation:
(1) Designating any non-opioid drug as a non-preferred drug if
any opioid or narcotic drug is designated as a preferred drug; or
*JMB175*
03-05-2025 10:13:47 JMB175

As Engrossed: H1/28/25 H2/12/25 S3/5/25 HB1186
(2) Establishing more restrictive or more extensive utilization
controls, including without limitation more restrictive or more extensive
prior authorization or step therapy requirements, for a non-opioid drug than
applicable to any opioid or narcotic drug.

/s/Vaught






























03-05-2025 10:13:47 JMB175